Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska27-410
Rule 410. Guilty plea; nolo contendere; offered plea; withdrawn plea; inadmissible; exceptions.

Evidence of a plea of guilty, later withdrawn, or a plea of nolo contendere, or of an offer to plead guilty or nolo contendere to the crime charged or any other crime, or of statements made in connection with any of the foregoing pleas or offers, is not admissible in any civil or criminal action, case, or proceeding against the person who made the plea or offer. This rule shall not apply to the introduction of voluntary and reliable statements made in court on the record in connection with any of the foregoing pleas or offers when offered for impeachment purposes or in a subsequent prosecution of the declarant for perjury or false statement.

Laws 1975, LB 279, § 20.

The evidentiary rule provided in this section, that a withdrawn guilty plea is not admissible in any civil or criminal action or proceeding against the person who made it, does not apply to the sentencing stage of a criminal proceeding. State v. Klappal, 218 Neb. 374, 355 N.W.2d 221 (1984).

Under some circumstances a plea of guilty entered by the defendant in a criminal action may be used against him as an admission in a subsequent action involving the same subject matter; a violation of a statute or ordinance enacted in the interest of public safety, while not negligence per se, is evidence of negligence. Schaefer v. McCreary, 216 Neb. 739, 345 N.W.2d 821 (1984).

The fact of conviction resulting from a nolo contendere plea may be used in a subsequent proceeding. In re Interest of Verle O., 13 Neb. App. 256, 691 N.W.2d 177 (2005).